en: lime
af: Lemmetjie
ar: ليم
as: গোলনেমু
be: Лайм
bg: Зелен лимон, лайм
bn: লেবু
br: limez
bs: Limeta
ca: llimona dolça, llima
cs: limetka
cv: Лайм
cy: leim
da: lime
de: Limette, Limetten, Limone
el: Μοσχολέμονο
eo: limeo
es: lima
eu: Lima
fa: لیموترش سبز
fi: limetti, limea, lime
fr: citron vert
ga: Líoma
gl: Lima
gv: Leeim
he: ליים
hi: नींबू
hr: limeta, limete
hu: zöldcitrom
it: limetta
ja: ライム
ka: ლაიმი
kn: ಲಿಂಬ್ಬೆ ಹಣ್ಣು
ko: 라임
la: Lumia
lo: ຫມາກນາວ
lv: laims
mk: Лимета
my: သံပရာ
nb: lime
nl: limoen, lime
nn: lime
nv: Chʼil dootłʼizhí díkʼǫ́zhígíí
oc: lime
or: ଲେମ୍ବୁ
os: Лайм
pa: ਗਲਗਲ
pl: Lima, limonka, limetka, limonki, limonek
pt: lima
ro: lămâie verde
ru: лайм
sh: Limeta
si: දෙහි
sk: limetka
sl: Limeta
sq: limon i athët
sr: лимета
sv: lime
sw: Ndimu
ta: தேசிப்பழம்
th: มะนาว
tr: Misket limonu
uk: Лайм
ur: گلگل
vi: Chanh
zh: 青檸

en: lime pulp
fr: Pulpe de citron vert
it: polpa di lime

en: raw lime pulp
fr: pulpe de citron vert cru
it: polpa di lime cruda

en: lime juice
bg: сок от лайм
ca: suc de llima
cs: Limetová šťáva, limetková šťáva
da: Limesaft
de: Limettensaft
es: Zumo de lima, jugo de lima
fi: limettimehu, limetäysmehu, limetinmehu, limen mehu
fr: jus de citron vert
hr: sok od limete
it: succo di lime
ja: ライムジュース, ライム果汁
nl: limoensap
pl: Sok limonkowy, sok z limonek
pt: Suco de lima, sumo de lima
ru: Лаймовый сок
sv: limejuice, limesaft

en: lime juice concentrate
de: limettensaftkonzentrat
es: Concentrado de zumo de lima, concentrado de jugo de lima
fi: limettimehutiiviste, limettitäysmehutiiviste, limemehutiiviste, limetäysmehutiiviste
fr: jus de citron vert concentré
hr: koncentrirani sok od limete
it: Succo di lime concentrato
sv: limesaftkoncentrat

en: reconstituted lime juice
de: rekonstituierter Limettensaft, limettensaft aus limettensaftkonzentrat
es: jugo de lima reconstituido
fi: limettimehu tiivisteestä, tiivisteestä valmistettu limettitäysmehu
fr: jus de citron vert à base de concentré
hr: rekonstituirani sok od limete
it: succo di lime ricostituito
nl: limoensap uit concentraat
pl: sok z limonki z zagęszczonego soku z limonki, sok z limonki z zagęszczonego soku z limonek, sok limonkowy z zagęszczonego soku limonkowego

de: Limettenschale
fr: écorces de citron vert, zeste de citron vert
it: scorze di lime

en: lime leaf, lime leaves
da: limeblad
de: Limettenblatt, Limettenblätter
fi: limetinlehti, limenlehti, limen lehti
fr: feuille de lime, feuille de citron vert
hr: list lipe
it: foglia di lime
nl: limoenblaadjes, limoenblad
sv: limeblad

en: mandarin, mandarine, mandarin orange
bg: мандарина, мандарини
ca: mandarina
co: mandarina
cs: mandarinka
cv: мандарин
da: mandarin, mandariner
de: Mandarine, Mandarinen
el: μανταρίνι
es: mandarina
et: mandariin
eu: mandarina
fi: mandariini
fr: mandarine
ga: mandairín
gl: mandarina
hr: mandarina
ht: mandarin
hu: mandarin
io: mandarino
it: mandarino, mandarini
ja: マンダリンオレンジ
lt: mandarina
lv: mandarīn
nb: mandarin
nl: mandarijn, mandarijnen
oc: mandarina
pl: mandarynka, mandarynki
pt: mandarina
ro: mandarină
ru: мандарин
sk: mandarínkoa
sv: mandarin
sw: mchenza
tr: mandalina
uk: мандарин

en: tangerine, tangerines, mandarin orange
hr: crvena mandarina

en: tangerine oil
de: Mandarinenöl
es: aceite de mandarina
fr: huile de mandarine
hr: ulje crvene mandarine
it: olio di mandarino
nl: mandarijnolie
pl: olej mandarynkowy

en: mandarin pulp
it: polpa di mandarino

en: tangerine juice, mandarin juice
cs: mandarinková šťáva
de: Mandarinesaft, Mandarinensaft
fi: mandariinimehu
fr: jus de mandarine
hr: sok od mandarine
it: succo di mandarino
nl: mandarijnsap
pl: sok mandarynkowy

en: concentrated mandarin juice
es: jugo de mandarina concentrado, concentrado de jugo de mandarina
fi: mandariinimehutiiviste, mandariinitäysmehutiiviste
fr: Jus de mandarine concentré
hr: koncentriranog soka od mandarine
it: succo concentrato di mandarino
ru: Концентрированный мандариновый сок

en: Mandarin juice from concentrate
cs: mandarinková šťáva z koncentrátu
da: mandarinjuice fra koncentrat
de: Mandarinensaft aus Konzentrat
fr: jus de mandarine à base de concentré
hr: sok od mandarine iz koncentrata
it: succo di mandarino da concentrato

en: squeezed tangerine juices
es: zumo de mandarina exprimada, jugo de mandarina exprimada
it: succo di mandarino spremuto

en: mandarin peel
bg: кора от мандарина
cs: mandarinková kůra
da: mandarinskaller
de: Mandarinenschale
el: φλούδα μανταμινού
es: piel de mandarina
et: mandariinikoored
fi: mandariinin kuoret
fr: écorce de mandarine
hr: kora mandarine
hu: mandarinhéj
it: scorze di mandarino
lt: mandarinų žievelės
lv: mandarina miziņas
nl: mandarijnschilletjes
no: mandarinskall
pl: skórka mandarynki
pt: casca de tangerina
ro: coajă de mandarim
sk: mandarínková kôra
sl: mandarinina lupina
sv: mandarinskal

en: mandarin with peel
hr: mandarine s korom

en: orange
ab: Апатырқал
af: Lemoen
ak: Ankaa
am: ብርቱካን
an: Narancha
ar: برتقال
as: সুমথিৰা টেঙা
az: Portağal
ba: Әфлисун
be: Апельсін
bg: портокал, портокали
bo: ཚ་ལུ་མ།
br: Aouraval
bs: Narandža
ca: taronja
cs: pomeranč
cv: Апельсин
cy: Oren
da: appelsin, appelsiner
de: Orange, Orangen, Apfelsine
dv: ނާރިނގު
el: πορτοκάλι
eo: oranĝo
es: naranja
et: Apelsinipuu, apelsin
eu: Laranja
fa: پرتقال
fi: appelsiini
fo: Appilsin
fr: orange
ga: Oráiste
gl: Laranxa
gu: સંતરુ
gv: Oranje
he: תפוז
hi: संतरा
hr: naranča, naranče
ht: Zoranj
hu: narancs
hy: Նարնջենի
id: Jeruk manis
io: Oranjo
is: Appelsína
it: arancia
ja: オレンジ
jv: Jeruk
ka: ფორთოხალი
kg: Dilala
kk: Апельсин
kn: ಕಿತ್ತಳೆ
ko: 오렌지
ku: Pirteqal
ky: Апельсин
la: Citrus sinensis
lb: Orange
lg: Omuchungwa
ln: Lilála
lo: ໝາກກ້ຽງ
lt: Apelsinas
lv: apelsīns
mg: voasary
mk: портокал
ml: ഓറഞ്ച്
mn: Жүрж
mr: संत्रे
ms: Oren
my: လိမ္မော်သီး
nb: appelsin
nl: sinaasappel, sinaasappels
nn: appelsin
nv: Chʼil łitsxooí
oc: Irange
or: କମଳା
os: Апельсин
pa: ਸੰਗਤਰਾ
pl: pomarańcza, pomarańczowy, pomarańczowa, pomarańczowe, pomarańczy, pomarańcze
ps: مالټه
pt: laranja
qu: Chilina
ro: Portocal
ru: апельсин
sa: नारङ्गफलम्
sd: نارنگي
se: Appelsiidna
sh: Naranča
sk: pomaranč
sl: Pomaranča
sm: Moli
sn: Ranjisi
so: Liin
sq: Portokalli
sr: наранџа
sv: Apelsin, apelsiner
sw: Chungwa
ta: தோடை
te: బత్తాయి
tg: ส้ม
tl: Dalandan
to: Moli
tr: Portakal
tt: әфлисун
ty: Ânani
ug: ئاپېلسىن
uk: Апельсин, апельсиновий
ur: مالٹا
uz: Apelsin
vi: Cam
yi: מאראנץ
yo: ọsàn
za: Makdoengj
zh: 橙

en: eating orange
de: Tafelobst-Orangen
hr: jedenje naranče
it: arancia da tavola
nl: eetsinaasappel